Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the State Library, for the biennium  beginning July
1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $4,534,451.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $311,951
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or  other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts other
than those described in section 3 of this 2021 Act, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the State Library.
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$7,154,970 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from moneys received from the assessment against state  agencies de-
scribed in ORS 357.203 and transferred to the Miscellaneous Receipts Account for  the State
Library.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$5,000,000 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the State Library.
SECTION 5. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Enrolled House Bill 5017 (HB 5017-A) Page 1
Passed by House May 24, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 7, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5017 (HB 5017-A) Page 2